Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-14,104
Termination of tenancy; action for possession and damages.

(1) A landlord may terminate a tenancy only by means of the procedures provided in the Mobile Home Landlord and Tenant Act.

(2) If a tenant remains in possession without the landlord's consent after expiration of the term of the rental agreement or its termination, the landlord may bring an action for possession and recover actual damages. If the tenant's holdover is willful and in bad faith, the landlord in addition may recover an amount not to exceed one and one-half months' periodic rent as liquidated damages and reasonable attorney's fees.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 55.